Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.020 and 2024 c 371 s 17, 2024 c 209 s 5, and 2024 c 62 s 18 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" has the same meaning as under RCW 71.24.025;(2) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;(3) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;(4) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;(6) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;(7) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;(8) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder;(9) "Behavioral health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health, substance use disorder, or co-occurring disorder services to persons with behavioral health disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to: Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section; community mental health service delivery systems or community behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025; licensed or certified behavioral health agencies under RCW 71.24.037; an entity with a tribal attestation that it meets minimum standards or a licensed or certified behavioral health agency as defined in RCW 71.24.025; facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW; approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section; secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities as defined in this section; and correctional facilities operated by state, local, and tribal governments;(10) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105;(11) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;(12) "Community behavioral health agency" has the same meaning as "licensed or certified behavioral health agency" defined in RCW 71.24.025;(13) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;(14) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual;(15) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;(16) "Department" means the department of health;(17) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the county, by an entity appointed by the county, or by the authority in consultation with a tribe or after meeting and conferring with an Indian health care provider, to perform the duties specified in this chapter;(18) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;(19) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;(20) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(6);(21) "Director" means the director of the authority;(22) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;(23) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;(24) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;(25) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;(26) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;(27) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.05.820;(28) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a behavioral health facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;(29) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;(30) "In need of assisted outpatient treatment" refers to a person who meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment established under RCW 71.05.148;(31) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;(32) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;(33) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;(34) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130;(35) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585. This term includes: Treatment pursuant to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320; treatment pursuant to a conditional release under RCW 71.05.340; and treatment pursuant to an assisted outpatient treatment order under RCW 71.05.148;(36) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;(37) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;(38) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder;(39) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;(40) "Mental health professional" means an individual practicing within the mental health professional's statutory scope of practice who is:(a) A psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, as defined in this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW;(b) A mental health counselor, mental health counselor associate, marriage and family therapist, or marriage and family therapist associate, as defined in chapter 18.225 RCW;(c) A certified or licensed agency affiliated counselor, as defined in chapter 18.19 RCW; or(d) A licensed psychological associate as described in chapter 18.83 RCW;(41) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;(42) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW;(43) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders;(44) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;(45) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;(46) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;(47) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;(48) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;(49) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;(50) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;(51) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health, or his or her designee;(52) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:(a) Provide the following services:(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;(ii) Clinical stabilization services;(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health;(53) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;(54) "State facility" means:(a) The center for behavioral health and learning located on the University of Washington medical center northwest campus; and(b) Facilities owned or operated by the department of social and health services that are not state hospitals that provide inpatient services to individuals under this chapter;(55) "State hospital" means a hospital designated under RCW 72.23.020;(56) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;(((55)))(57) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW;(((56)))(58) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;(((57)))(59) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for behavioral health disorders, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, managed care organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;(((58)))(60) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025;(((59)))(61) "Video," unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology. "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment;(((60)))(62) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.020 and 2024 c 371 s 18, 2024 c 209 s 6, and 2024 c 62 s 19 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" has the same meaning as under RCW 71.24.025;(2) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;(3) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;(4) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;(6) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;(7) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;(8) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder;(9) "Behavioral health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health, substance use disorder, or co-occurring disorder services to persons with behavioral health disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to: Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section; community mental health service delivery systems or community behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025; licensed or certified behavioral health agencies under RCW 71.24.037; an entity with a tribal attestation that it meets minimum standards or a licensed or certified behavioral health agency as defined in RCW 71.24.025; facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW; approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section; secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities as defined in this section; and correctional facilities operated by state, local, and tribal governments;(10) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105;(11) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;(12) "Community behavioral health agency" has the same meaning as "licensed or certified behavioral health agency" defined in RCW 71.24.025;(13) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;(14) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual;(15) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;(16) "Department" means the department of health;(17) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the county, by an entity appointed by the county, or by the authority in consultation with a tribe or after meeting and conferring with an Indian health care provider, to perform the duties specified in this chapter;(18) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;(19) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;(20) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(6);(21) "Director" means the director of the authority;(22) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;(23) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;(24) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;(25) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration from safe behavior evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;(26) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;(27) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.05.820;(28) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a behavioral health facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;(29) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;(30) "In need of assisted outpatient treatment" refers to a person who meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment established under RCW 71.05.148;(31) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;(32) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;(33) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;(34) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130;(35) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585. This term includes: Treatment pursuant to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320; treatment pursuant to a conditional release under RCW 71.05.340; and treatment pursuant to an assisted outpatient treatment order under RCW 71.05.148;(36) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;(37) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused harm, substantial pain, or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of harm to themselves or others; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;(38) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder;(39) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;(40) "Mental health professional" means an individual practicing within the mental health professional's statutory scope of practice who is:(a) A psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, as defined in this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW;(b) A mental health counselor, mental health counselor associate, marriage and family therapist, or marriage and family therapist associate, as defined in chapter 18.225 RCW;(c) A certified or licensed agency affiliated counselor, as defined in chapter 18.19 RCW; or(d) A licensed psychological associate as described in chapter 18.83 RCW;(41) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;(42) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW;(43) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders;(44) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;(45) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;(46) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;(47) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;(48) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;(49) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;(50) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;(51) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health, or his or her designee;(52) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:(a) Provide the following services:(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;(ii) Clinical stabilization services;(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health;(53) "Severe deterioration from safe behavior" means that a person will, if not treated, suffer or continue to suffer severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress, and this distress is associated with significant impairment of judgment, reason, or behavior;(54) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;(55) "State facility" means:(a) The center for behavioral health and learning located on the University of Washington medical center northwest campus; and(b) Facilities owned or operated by the department of social and health services that are not state hospitals that provide inpatient services to individuals under this chapter;(56) "State hospital" means a hospital designated under RCW 72.23.020;(57) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;(((56)))(58) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW;(((57)))(59) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;(((58)))(60) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for behavioral health disorders, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, managed care organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;(((59)))(61) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025;(((60)))(62) "Video," unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology. "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment;(((61)))(63) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.Sec. 3. RCW 71.05.110 and 2019 c 325 s 3005 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The county where the person is detained shall administer appointed counsel under this chapter, regardless of the person's county of origin. Reimbursement for the costs of such representation is specified under RCW 71.05.730. The county shall provide counsel:(a) Directly;(b) By contracting for that representation; or(c) When an individual is detained at a state facility, by submitting a request to the health care authority to contract for such counsel with the office of public defense on the county's behalf under chapter 2.70 RCW.(2) The health care authority shall notify the county within 30 days of receiving notice from the office of public defense that appointed counsel cannot be provided by the office of public defense under subsection (1)(c) of this section. Upon such notice, the county shall provide appointed counsel pursuant to subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section.(3) Attorneys appointed for persons pursuant to this chapter shall be compensated for their services as follows: (((1)))(a) The person for whom an attorney is appointed shall, if he or she is financially able pursuant to standards as to financial capability and indigency set by the superior court of the county in which the proceeding is held, bear the costs of such legal services; (((2)))(b) if such person is indigent pursuant to such standards, the behavioral health administrative services organization shall reimburse the county in which the proceeding is held for the direct costs of such legal services except when the office of public defense is providing counsel under subsection (1)(c) of this section, as provided in RCW 71.05.730.(4) This section supersedes any local ordinance, charter, or rule.Sec. 4. RCW 71.05.130 and 2015 c 258 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:In any judicial proceeding for involuntary commitment or detention except under RCW 71.05.201, or in any proceeding challenging involuntary commitment or detention, the prosecuting attorney for the county in which the proceeding was initiated shall represent the individuals or agencies petitioning for commitment or detention and shall defend all challenges to such commitment or detention, except that the attorney general shall represent and provide legal services and advice to state hospitals ((or institutions))and state facilities with regard to all provisions of and proceedings under this chapter other than proceedings initiated by such hospitals and ((institutions))facilities seeking ((fourteen day))14-day detention.Sec. 5. RCW 71.05.730 and 2024 c 209 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A county may apply to its behavioral health administrative services organization on a quarterly basis for reimbursement of its direct costs in providing judicial services for civil commitment cases under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW. A tribe may apply to the authority on a quarterly basis for reimbursement of its direct costs in providing judicial services for civil commitment cases under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW. The behavioral health administrative services organization shall in turn be entitled to reimbursement from the behavioral health administrative services organization that serves the county of residence of the individual who is the subject of the civil commitment case.(2) Reimbursement for judicial services shall be provided per civil commitment case at a rate to be determined based on an independent assessment of the county's or tribe's actual direct costs. This assessment must be based on an average of the expenditures for judicial services within the county or tribe over the past three years. In the event that a baseline cannot be established because there is no significant history of similar cases within the county or tribe, the reimbursement rate shall be equal to 80 percent of the median reimbursement rate of counties or tribes, if applicable included in the independent assessment.(3) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Civil commitment case" includes all judicial hearings related to a single episode of hospitalization or less restrictive alternative treatment, except that the filing of a petition for a one hundred eighty-day commitment under this chapter or a petition for a successive 180-day commitment under chapter 71.34 RCW shall be considered to be a new case regardless of whether there has been a break in detention. "Civil commitment case" does not include the filing of a petition for a 180-day commitment under this chapter on behalf of a patient at a state ((psychiatric)) hospital.(b) "Judicial services" means a county's or tribe's reasonable direct costs in providing prosecutor services, assigned counsel and defense services, court services, and court clerk services for civil commitment cases under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW.(4) In the case where a county has requested that the health care authority contract for public defense services on the county's behalf under RCW 71.05.110, the authority shall reduce the funding provided to the county's behavioral health administrative services organization equivalent to the authority's expense in contracting with the office of public defense for that representation. The county's behavioral health administrative services organization may still seek reimbursement from the behavioral health administrative services organization that serves the county of residence of the individual who is the subject of the civil commitment case under subsection (1) of this section.(5) To the extent that resources have a shared purpose, the behavioral health administrative services organization may only reimburse counties to the extent such resources are necessary for and devoted to judicial services as described in this section. To the extent that resources have a shared purpose, the authority may only reimburse tribes to the extent the resources are necessary for and devoted to judicial services as described in this section.(((5)))(6) No filing fee may be charged or collected for any civil commitment case subject to reimbursement under this section.Sec. 6. RCW 71.34.020 and 2024 c 367 s 3 and 2024 c 209 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(2) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a minor should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital.(3) "Adolescent" means a minor thirteen years of age or older.(4) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.(5) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to, atypical antipsychotic medications.(6) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.(7) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a minor patient.(8) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.(9) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(10) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder.(11) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.(12) "Children's mental health specialist" means:(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.(13) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.(14) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.(15) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.(16) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department of health under RCW 71.24.035, such as a residential treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual.(17) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment.(18) "Department" means the department of social and health services.(19) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.(20) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter.(21) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department.(22) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.(23) "Director" means the director of the authority.(24) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order.(25) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.(26) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.(27) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, (a) is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.(28) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist minors in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, behavioral, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy.(29) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.34.910.(30) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time five years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term substance use disorder treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.(31) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which states:(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences.(32)(a) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "inpatient treatment" has the meaning included in (a) of this subsection and any other residential treatment facility licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.(33) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.(34) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.(35) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.031(((22)(a))).(36) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130.(37) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor as a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.34.755, including residential treatment.(38) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.(39) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon another individual, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or(b) The minor has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts.(40) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(41) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder.(42) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a disability, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.(43) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.(44) "Mental health professional" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.(45) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.(46) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies as identified by RCW 71.24.025.(47)(a) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement, or a person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "parent" also includes a person to whom a parent defined in (a) of this subsection has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the adolescent, a stepparent who is involved in caring for the adolescent, a kinship caregiver who is involved in caring for the adolescent, or another relative who is responsible for the health care of the adolescent, who may be required to provide a declaration under penalty of perjury stating that he or she is a relative responsible for the health care of the adolescent pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW. If a dispute arises between individuals authorized to act as a parent for the purpose of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, the disagreement must be resolved according to the priority established under RCW 7.70.065(2)(a).(48) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.(49) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW.(50) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.(51) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.(52) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.(53) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.(54) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.(55) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.(56) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter.(57) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW.(58) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.(59) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.(60) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:(a) Provide the following services:(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;(ii) Clinical stabilization services;(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health.(61) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.(62) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.(63) "State hospital" means a hospital designated under RCW 72.23.020.(64) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.(((64)))(65) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.(((65)))(66) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.(((66)))(67) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties.(((67)))(68) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.(((68)))(69) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025.(((69)))(70) "Video" means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology.(((70)))(71) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.Sec. 7. RCW 71.34.020 and 2024 c 367 s 4 and 2024 c 209 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(2) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a minor should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital.(3) "Adolescent" means a minor thirteen years of age or older.(4) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.(5) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to, atypical antipsychotic medications.(6) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.(7) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a minor patient.(8) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.(9) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(10) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder.(11) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.(12) "Children's mental health specialist" means:(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.(13) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.(14) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.(15) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.(16) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department of health under RCW 71.24.035, such as a residential treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual.(17) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment.(18) "Department" means the department of social and health services.(19) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.(20) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter.(21) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department.(22) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.(23) "Director" means the director of the authority.(24) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order.(25) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.(26) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.(27) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, (a) is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or (b) manifests severe deterioration from safe behavior evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.(28) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist minors in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, behavioral, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy.(29) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.34.910.(30) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time five years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term substance use disorder treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.(31) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which states:(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences.(32)(a) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "inpatient treatment" has the meaning included in (a) of this subsection and any other residential treatment facility licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.(33) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.(34) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.(35) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.031(((22)(a))).(36) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130.(37) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor as a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.34.755, including residential treatment.(38) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.(39) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon another individual, as evidenced by behavior which has caused harm, substantial pain, or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of harm to themselves or others; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or(b) The minor has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts.(40) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(41) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder.(42) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a disability, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.(43) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.(44) "Mental health professional" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.(45) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.(46) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies as identified by RCW 71.24.025.(47)(a) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement, or a person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "parent" also includes a person to whom a parent defined in (a) of this subsection has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the adolescent, a stepparent who is involved in caring for the adolescent, a kinship caregiver who is involved in caring for the adolescent, or another relative who is responsible for the health care of the adolescent, who may be required to provide a declaration under penalty of perjury stating that he or she is a relative responsible for the health care of the adolescent pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW. If a dispute arises between individuals authorized to act as a parent for the purpose of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, the disagreement must be resolved according to the priority established under RCW 7.70.065(2)(a).(48) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.(49) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW.(50) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.(51) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.(52) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.(53) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.(54) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.(55) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.(56) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter.(57) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW.(58) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.(59) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.(60) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:(a) Provide the following services:(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;(ii) Clinical stabilization services;(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health.(61) "Severe deterioration from safe behavior" means that a person will, if not treated, suffer or continue to suffer severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress, and this distress is associated with significant impairment of judgment, reason, or behavior.(62) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.(63) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.(64) "State hospital" means a hospital designated under RCW 72.23.020.(65) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.(((65)))(66) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.(((66)))(67) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.(((67)))(68) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties.(((68)))(69) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.(((69)))(70) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025.(((70)))(71) "Video" means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology.(((71)))(72) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.Sec. 8. RCW 72.23.010 and 2000 c 22 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington.(2) "Department" means the department of social and health services.(3) "Employee" means an employee as defined in RCW 49.17.020.(4) "Licensed physician" means an individual permitted to practice as a physician under the laws of the state, or a medical officer, similarly qualified, of the government of the United States while in this state in performance of his or her official duties.(5) "Mentally ill person" means any person who, pursuant to the definitions contained in RCW 71.05.020, as a result of a mental disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm to others or himself or herself or is gravely disabled.(6) "Patient" means a person under observation, care, or treatment in a state hospital, or a person found mentally ill by the court, and not discharged from a state hospital, or other facility, to which such person had been ordered hospitalized.(7) "Resident" means a resident of the state of Washington.(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.(9) "State hospital" means ((any))a hospital((, including a child study and treatment center, operated and maintained by the state of Washington for the care of the mentally ill))designated under RCW 72.23.020.(10) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of a state hospital.(11) "Violence" or "violent act" means any physical assault or attempted physical assault against an employee or patient of a state hospital.Wherever used in this chapter, the masculine shall include the feminine and the singular shall include the plural.Sec. 9. RCW 72.23.020 and 1959 c 28 s 72.23.020 are each amended to read as follows:There are hereby permanently located and established the following state hospitals: Western state hospital at Fort Steilacoom, Pierce county; eastern state hospital at Medical Lake, Spokane county; and ((northern state hospital near Sedro Woolley, Skagit county))the child study and treatment center at Fort Steilacoom, Pierce county.Sec. 10. RCW 2.70.020 and 2024 c 294 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The director shall:(1) Administer all state-funded services in the following program areas:(a) Trial court criminal indigent defense, as provided in chapter 10.101 RCW;(b) Appellate indigent defense, as provided in this chapter and RCW 10.73.150;(c) Representation of indigent parents qualified for appointed counsel in dependency and termination cases, as provided in RCW 13.34.090 and 13.34.092;(d) Extraordinary criminal justice cost petitions, as provided in RCW 43.330.190;(e) Compilation of copies of DNA test requests by persons convicted of felonies, as provided in RCW 10.73.170;(f) Representation of indigent respondents qualified for appointed counsel in sexually violent predator civil commitment cases, as provided in chapter 71.09 RCW; ((and))(g) Representation of indigent persons who are acquitted by reason of insanity and committed to state psychiatric care as provided in chapter 10.77 RCW; and(h) At the request of the health care authority on behalf of a county under chapter 71.05 RCW, representation of indigent persons qualified for appointed counsel in involuntary commitment cases;(2) Subject to availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, provide access to counsel for indigent persons incarcerated in a juvenile rehabilitation or adult correctional facility to file and prosecute a first, timely personal restraint petition under RCW 10.73.150. The office shall establish eligibility criteria that prioritize access to counsel for youth under age 25, youth or adults with sentences in excess of 120 months, youth or adults with disabilities, and youth or adults with limited English proficiency. Nothing in this subsection creates an entitlement to counsel at state expense to file a personal restraint petition;(3) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, appoint counsel to petition the sentencing court if the legislature creates an ability to petition the sentencing court, or appoint counsel to challenge a conviction or sentence if a final decision of an appellate court creates the ability to challenge a conviction or sentence. Nothing in this subsection creates an entitlement to counsel at state expense to petition the sentencing court;(4) Provide access to attorneys for juveniles contacted by a law enforcement officer for whom a legal consultation is required under RCW 13.40.740;(5) Submit a biennial budget for all costs related to the office's program areas;(6) Establish administrative procedures, standards, and guidelines for the office's program areas, including cost-efficient systems that provide for authorized recovery of costs;(7) Provide oversight and technical assistance to ensure the effective and efficient delivery of services in the office's program areas;(8) Recommend criteria and standards for determining and verifying indigency. In recommending criteria for determining indigency, the director shall compile and review the indigency standards used by other state agencies and shall periodically submit the compilation and report to the legislature on the appropriateness and consistency of such standards;(9) Collect information regarding indigent defense services funded by the state and report annually to the advisory committee, the legislature, and the supreme court;(10) Coordinate with the supreme court and the judges of each division of the court of appeals to determine how appellate attorney services should be provided.Sec. 11. RCW 2.70.023 and 2024 c 294 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the office of public defense shall not provide direct representation of clients.(2) In order to protect and preserve client rights when administering the office's statutory duties to provide initial telephonic or video consultation services, managing and supervising attorneys of the office of public defense who meet applicable public defense qualifications may provide limited short-term coverage for the consultation services if office of public defense contracted counsel is unavailable to provide the consultation services. The office shall provide services in a manner consistent with the rules of professional conduct, chapter 42.52 RCW, and applicable policies of the office of public defense.(3) The office of public defense may facilitate and supervise placement of law clerks, externs, and interns with office of public defense contracted counsel, in a manner consistent with the Washington admission and practice rules, the rules of professional conduct, chapter 42.52 RCW, and applicable policies of the office of public defense.(4) Employees of the office of public defense may provide pro bono legal services in a manner consistent with the rules of professional conduct, chapter 42.52 RCW, and applicable policies of the office of public defense. The policies of the office of public defense must require that employees providing pro bono legal services obtain and provide to the office a written statement, signed by any pro bono client, acknowledging that:(a) The pro bono legal services are provided by the employee acting in the employee's personal capacity and not as an employee of the office of public defense; and(b) The state of Washington may not be held liable for any claim arising from the provision of pro bono legal services by the employees of the office of public defense.The office of public defense shall retain the written statements in a manner consistent with records relating to potential conflicts of interest.(5) The office of public defense shall provide public defense services for indigent persons qualified for appointed counsel in involuntary commitment cases under chapter 71.05 RCW at the request of the health care authority on behalf of a county, either directly or by contracting with persons admitted to practice law in this state or organizations that employ persons admitted to practice law in this state, using funds provided by the county pursuant to RCW 71.05.110.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2024 c 62 s 26; and(2) 2024 c 62 s 27.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. Section 1 of this act expires when section 2 of this act takes effect.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. Section 2 of this act takes effect when the contingency in section 26, chapter 433, Laws of 2023 takes effect.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. Section 6 of this act expires when section 7 of this act takes effect.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. Section 7 of this act takes effect when the contingency in section 13, chapter 433, Laws of 2023 takes effect.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---